New York, session 2025-2026, A11590.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The surrogate's court procedure act is amended by adding a 2 new section 2116 to read as follows: 3 § 2116. Assignment made to a transferee for value acquiring any interest 4 of a beneficiary in exchange for cash or other consideration; 5 written agreement 6 1. Where an assignment from a decedent's estate is made to a transfer- 7 ee for value who acquires any interest of a beneficiary in exchange for 8 cash or other consideration, such assignment shall be in the form of a 9 written agreement and shall be subject to the provisions of this 10 section. 11 2. For purposes of this section, "transferee for value" means a person 12 who satisfies both of the following criteria: 13 (a) the person purchases the interest from a beneficiary for consider- 14 ation pursuant to a written agreement; and 15 (b) the person, directly or indirectly, regularly engages in the 16 purchase of beneficial interests in estates for consideration. 17 3. This section shall not apply to any of the following: 18 (a) a transferee who is a beneficiary of the estate or a person who 19 has a claim to distribution from the estate under another instrument or 20 by intestate succession; 21 (b) a transferee who is either the registered domestic partner of the 22 beneficiary, or is related by blood, marriage, or adoption to the bene- 23 ficiary or the decedent; or 24 (c) a transferee who is engaged in the business of locating missing or 25 unknown heirs and who acquires an interest from a beneficiary solely in 26 exchange for providing information or services associated with locating 27 the heir or beneficiary. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15833-01-6 A. 11590 2 1 4. A written agreement required by this section shall be valid only if 2 all of the following conditions are met: 3 (a) the executed written agreement is filed with the court, in accord- 4 ance with 22 NYCRR 207.47, not later than forty-five days following the 5 date of its execution or, if administration of the decedent's estate has 6 not commenced, not later than forty-five days following the issuance by 7 the court of fiduciary letters. Prior to filing or serving such written 8 agreement, the transferee for value shall redact any personally identi- 9 fying information about the beneficiary, other than the name and address 10 of the beneficiary, and any financial information provided by the bene- 11 ficiary to the transferee for value on the application for cash or other 12 consideration, from the agreement; 13 (b) if the negotiation or discussion between the beneficiary and the 14 transferee for value leading to the execution of the written agreement 15 by the beneficiary was conducted in a language other than English, the 16 beneficiary shall receive the written agreement in English, together 17 with a copy of the agreement translated into the language in which it 18 was negotiated or discussed. The written agreement and the translated 19 copy, if any, shall be provided to the beneficiary; 20 (c) the documents signed by, or provided to, the beneficiary are 21 printed in at least ten-point type; 22 (d) the transferee for value executes a declaration or affidavit 23 attesting that the requirements of this section have been satisfied, and 24 the declaration or affidavit is filed with the court within forty-five 25 days of execution of the written agreement or, if administration of the 26 decedent's estate has not commenced, not later than forty-five days 27 following the issuance by the court of fiduciary letters; and 28 (e) notice of the assignment is served on the personal representative 29 or the attorney of record for the personal representative within forty- 30 five days of execution of the written agreement or, if letters of admin- 31 istration or letters testamentary have not been issued, not later than 32 forty-five days following the issuance by the court of fiduciary 33 letters. 34 5. The written agreement shall include the following terms, in addi- 35 tion to any other terms: 36 (a) the amount of consideration paid to the beneficiary; 37 (b) a description of the transferred interest; 38 (c) if the written agreement so provides, the amount by which the 39 transferee for value would have its distribution reduced if the benefi- 40 cial interest assigned is distributed prior to a specified date; and 41 (d) a statement of the total of all costs or fees charged to the bene- 42 ficiary resulting from the transfer for value, including, but not limit- 43 ed to, transaction or processing fees, credit report costs, title search 44 costs, due diligence fees, filing fees, bank or electronic transfer 45 costs, or any other fees or costs. If all the costs and fees are paid by 46 the transferee for value and are included in the amount of the trans- 47 ferred interest, then the statement of costs need not itemize any costs 48 or fees. This subdivision shall not apply to costs, fees, or damages 49 arising out of a material breach of the agreement or fraud by or on the 50 part of the beneficiary. 51 6. A written agreement shall not contain any of the following 52 provisions and, if any such provision is included, such provision shall 53 be deemed null and void: 54 (a) a provision holding harmless the transferee for value, other than 55 for liability arising out of fraud by the beneficiary; A. 11590 3 1 (b) a provision granting to the transferee for value agency powers to 2 represent the beneficiary's interest in the decedent's estate beyond the 3 interest transferred; 4 (c) a provision requiring payment by the beneficiary to the transferee 5 for value for services not related to the written agreement or services 6 other than the transfer of interest under the written agreement; and 7 (d) a provision permitting the transferee for value to have recourse 8 against the beneficiary if the distribution from the estate in satisfac- 9 tion of the beneficial interest is less than the beneficial interest 10 assigned to the transferee for value, other than recourse for any 11 expense or damage arising out of the material breach of the agreement or 12 fraud by the beneficiary. 13 7. The court on its own, may inquire into the circumstances surround- 14 ing the execution of, and the consideration for, the written agreement 15 for purposes of determining whether the requirements of this section 16 have been satisfied. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.